Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4574.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0132, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 40. new text end new text begin Firefighter pensions. new text end new text begin (a) The amount of firefighter pension income is a subtraction. new text end new text begin (b) For the purposes of this subdivision, "firefighter pension income" means annuity income or a lump-sum payment from a public retirement plan based on service as a firefighter, as defined in section 299N.01, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end